Hawaii statutes.
§651-21 Deficiency. If, after selling
all the property attached by the levying officer remaining in the levying
officer's hands, and applying the proceeds, deducting the levying officer's
fees, to the payment of the judgment, any balance remains due, the levying
officer shall proceed to collect the balance as upon an execution in other
cases. Whenever the judgment has been paid, the levying officer, upon
reasonable demand, shall deliver over to the defendant, the attached property
remaining in the levying officer's hands, and any proceeds of the property
attached unapplied on the judgment. [L 1905, c 84, §21; RL 1925, §2825; RL
1935, §4210; RL 1945, §10161; RL 1955, §233-21; HRS §651-21; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next